California statutes. Corporations Code
 action or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative; and “expenses” includes without limitation attorneys’ fees and any expenses of establishing a right to indemnification under subdivision (d) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (e).

(b) A corporation shall have power to indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any proceeding (other than an action by or in the right of the corporation to procure a judgment in its favor) by reason of the fact that the person is or was an agent of the corporation, against expenses, judgments, fines, settlements and other amounts actually and reasonably incurred in connection with
 the proceeding if
 the person acted in good faith and in a manner the person reasonably believed to be in the best interests of the corporation and, in the case of a criminal proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct of the person was unlawful. The termination of any proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent shall not, of itself, create a presumption that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner
 that the person reasonably believed to be in the best interests of the corporation or that the person had reasonable cause to believe that the person’s conduct was unlawful.

(c) A corporation shall have power to indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action by or in the right of the corporation, to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that the person is or was an agent of the corporation, against expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the
 person in connection with the defense or settlement of the action if
 the person acted in good faith, in a manner the person believed to be in the best interests of the corporation and with that care, including reasonable inquiry, as an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances. No indemnification shall be made under this subdivision:

(1) In respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which
 the person shall have been adjudged to be liable to the corporation in the performance of
 the person’s duty to the corporation, unless and only to the extent that the court in which the proceeding is or was pending shall determine upon application that, in view of all the circumstances of the case, the person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for the expenses which the court shall determine;

(2) Of
 amounts paid in settling or otherwise disposing of a threatened or pending action, with or without court approval; or

(3) Of expenses incurred in defending a threatened or pending action which is settled or otherwise disposed of without court approval.

(d) To the extent that an agent of a corporation has been successful on the merits in defense of any proceeding referred to in subdivision (b) or (c) or in defense of any claim, issue, or matter therein, the agent shall be indemnified against expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the agent in connection therewith.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (d), any indemnification under this section shall be made by the corporation only if authorized in the specific case, upon a determination that indemnification of the agent is proper in the circumstances because
 the agent has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in subdivision (b) or (c), by:

(1) A majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors who are not parties to the proceeding;

(2) Approval of the members (Section 12224), with the persons to be indemnified not being entitled to vote thereon; or

(3) The court in which the proceeding is or was pending upon application made by the corporation or the agent or the attorney
 or other person rendering services in connection with the defense, whether or not
 the application by the agent, attorney or other person is opposed by the corporation.

(f) Expenses incurred in defending any proceeding may be advanced by the corporation prior to the final disposition of the proceeding upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the agent to repay the amount unless it shall be determined ultimately that the agent is entitled to be indemnified as authorized in this section.

(g) No provision made by a corporation to
 indemnify its or its subsidiary’s directors or officers for the defense of any proceeding, whether contained in the articles, bylaws, a resolution of members or directors, an agreement or otherwise, shall be valid unless consistent with this section. Nothing contained in this section shall affect any right to indemnification to which persons other than
 the directors and officers may be entitled by contract or otherwise.

(h) No indemnification or advance shall be made under this section, except as provided in subdivision (d) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), in any circumstance where it appears:

(1) That it would be inconsistent with a provision of the articles, bylaws, a resolution of the members or an agreement in effect at the time of the accrual of the alleged cause of action asserted in the proceeding in which the expenses were incurred or other amounts were paid, which prohibits or otherwise limits indemnification; or

(2) That it would be inconsistent with any condition expressly imposed by a court in approving a settlement.

(i) A corporation shall have
 power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any agent of the corporation against any liability asserted against or incurred by the agent in that capacity or arising out of the agent’s status as such whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify the agent against that liability under the provisions of this section.

(j) This section does not apply to any proceeding against any trustee, investment manager, or other fiduciary
 of
 a pension, deferred compensation, saving, thrift, or other retirement, incentive, or benefit plan, trust, or provision for any or all of the corporation’s directors, officers, employees, and persons providing services to the corporation or any of its subsidiary or related or affiliated corporations,
 in the
 person’s capacity as such, even though the person may also be an agent as defined in subdivision (a) of the employer corporation. A corporation shall have power to indemnify the trustee, investment manager or other fiduciary to the extent permitted by subdivision (e) of Section
 12320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 61, Sec. 4.   (AB 2668)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Members [12400. - 12446.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance of Memberships [12400. - 12405.]

12400.

Subject to the articles or bylaws, memberships may be issued by a corporation for no consideration or for such consideration as is determined by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.

(a) A corporation may issue, but is not required to issue, membership certificates. In the event that membership certificates are issued, the certificates shall state the information required to be contained in the disclosure document described in subdivision (b). Nothing in this section shall restrict a corporation from issuing identity cards or similar devices to members which serve to identify members qualifying to use facilities or services of the corporation.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), prior to issuing a membership, the corporation shall provide the purchaser of a membership with a disclosure document. The disclosure document may be a prospectus, offering circular, brochure, or similar document, a specimen copy of the membership certificate, or a receipt which the corporation proposes to issue. The disclosure document shall contain the following information:

(1) A statement that the corporation is a cooperative corporation.

(2) A statement that a copy of the corporation’s articles and bylaws will be furnished without charge to a member or prospective member upon written request, and the address of the office of the corporation and the address to which such a written request is to be directed.

(3) If there are restrictions imposed by the corporation upon the transfer of membership, a statement to that effect and the restrictions imposed on transfer.

(4) If the corporation may levy dues, assessments, or membership or transfer fees, a statement to that effect and the conditions under which the corporation may make such a levy.

(5) If the member is required to contribute services to the corporation, a statement to that effect and the amount and nature of the services to be contributed to the corporation.

(6) Whether the membership is redeemable and the conditions under which the membership may be redeemed at the option of the corporation or the member.

(7) If the voting power or the proprietary interests of the members is unequal, a statement to that effect and the rule or rules by which the voting power and proprietary rights are to be determined.

(8) In lieu of specifying verbatim in the disclosure document the restrictions on the transfer of a membership, conditions of levy, amount and nature of services to be contributed, conditions under which memberships are redeemable, or the rules by which the voting power and proprietary rights of members are to be determined, the disclosure document may contain a statement that such information will be provided free of charge to a member or prospective member who requests it in writing. If the disclosure document contains such a statement it shall also set forth the address of the office of the corporation and the address to which such a request is to be directed.

(c) If the articles or bylaws are amended so that any statement required by subdivision (a) on outstanding membership certificates is no longer accurate, the board may cancel the outstanding certificates and issue in their place new certificates conforming to the articles or bylaws amendments.

(d) When new membership certificates are issued in accordance with subdivision (c), the board may order holders of outstanding certificates to surrender and exchange them for new certificates within a reasonable time fixed by the board. The board may further provide that the holder of the certificate to be surrendered shall not be entitled to exercise any of the rights of membership until the certificate is surrendered, but such rights shall be suspended only after notice of the order is given to the holder of the certificate and only until the certificate is surrendered. The requirement to surrender outstanding certificates may be enforced by civil action.

(e) A corporation shall issue a membership certificate, receipt, or written advice of purchase to anyone purchasing a membership upon the member’s first purchase of a membership of any class. No disclosure document need be provided to an existing member prior to the purchase of additional memberships if that member has previously been provided with a disclosure document which is accurate and correct as of the date of the purchase of the additional memberships.

(f) If a corporation does not issue new certificates as contemplated by subdivisions (c) and (d), and if a transferee of a membership certificate has not previously been provided with a disclosure statement which is accurate and correct as of the date of registration of the transfer, then the corporation shall provide a disclosure document to the transferee upon registration with the corporation of the transfer of the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.

(a) A corporation may issue a new membership certificate in the place of any certificate theretofore issued by it, alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, and the corporation may require the owner of the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or the owner’s legal representative to give the corporation a bond (or other adequate security) sufficient to indemnify it against any claim that may be made against it (including any expense or liability) on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of any such certificate or the issuance of such new certificate.

(b) If a corporation refuses to issue a new membership certificate or other certificate in place of one theretofore issued by it, or by any corporation of which it is the lawful successor, alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, the owner of the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or the owner’s legal representative may bring an action in the superior court of the proper county for an order requiring the corporation to issue a new certificate in place of the one lost, stolen or destroyed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12403.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), or in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may admit any person to membership.

(b) A corporation may not admit its subsidiary to membership.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12404.

Except as permitted in Sections 12314 and 12404.5, the voting power of members having voting rights shall be equal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 14.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12404.5.

(a) The worker-members of a worker cooperative shall have voting power as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 12253.

(b) Community investors have voting power only as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 12253.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 15.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12405.

There shall be no voting by proxy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfer of Memberships [12410. - 12410.]

12410.

(a) Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide:

(1) No member may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom; and

(2) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (b), Section 12422, and Section 12445, all rights as a member of the corporation cease upon the member’s death or dissolution or the dissolution of a member which is a business entity.

(b) The articles or bylaws may provide for, or may authorize the board to provide for, the transfer of memberships, or of memberships within any class or classes, with or without restriction or limitation, including transfer upon the death, dissolution, merger, or reorganization of a member.

(c) Where transfer rights have been provided, no restriction of them shall be binding with respect to memberships issued prior to the adoption of the restriction, unless the holders of such memberships voted in favor of the restriction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Types of Memberships [12420. - 12422.]

12420.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a corporation may issue memberships having different rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions, as provided in its articles or bylaws. If the articles or bylaws authorize at least one class of voting memberships, a corporation may also authorize and issue additional classes of memberships, preferred or otherwise, that are divisible into a series or are nonvoting or both.

(b) All worker-members shall have the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions as provided in the articles or bylaws. This membership shall not be divided into partial memberships.

(c) A worker cooperative shall
 only make patronage distributions to the worker-member class.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 16.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12421.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws, all memberships shall have the same rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions and conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12422.

(a) Unless the corporation’s articles or bylaws so provide, memberships are not redeemable. A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for one or more classes or series of memberships which are redeemable, in whole or in part, for such consideration within such time or upon the happening of one or more specified events and upon the terms and conditions
 stated in the articles or bylaws. However, no membership shall actually be redeemed if prohibited by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12450).

(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent a corporation from creating a sinking fund or similar provision for, or entering into an agreement for, the redemption or purchase of its memberships to the extent permitted by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12450).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 538, Sec. 7.   (AB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Termination of Memberships [12430. - 12431.]

12430.

(a) A member may resign from membership at any time, although the articles or bylaws may require reasonable notice before the resignation is effective.

(b) This section shall not relieve the resigning member from any obligation for charges incurred, services or benefits actually rendered, dues, assessments or fees, or arising from contract, a condition to ownership of land, an obligation arising out of the ownership of land, or otherwise, and this section shall not diminish any right of the corporation to enforce any such obligation or obtain damages for its breach.

(c) A membership issued for a period of time shall expire when such period of time has elapsed unless the membership is renewed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12431.

(a) No member may be expelled or suspended, and no membership or memberships may be terminated or suspended, except according to procedures satisfying the requirements of this section. An expulsion, termination, or suspension not in accord with this section shall be void and without effect.

(b) Any expulsion, suspension, or termination must be done in good faith and in a fair and reasonable manner. Any procedure that conforms to the requirements of subdivision (c) or (d) is fair and reasonable, but a court may also find other procedures to be fair and reasonable when the full circumstances of the suspension, termination, or expulsion are considered.

(c) A procedure is fair and reasonable if all of the following occur:

(1) The provisions of the procedure have been set forth in the articles or bylaws, or copies of such provisions are sent annually to all the members as required by the articles or bylaws.

(2) It provides the giving of 15 days’ prior notice of the expulsion, suspension, or termination and the reasons therefor.

(3) It provides an opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination by a person or body authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, termination, or suspension not take place.

(d) Any notice required under
 this section may be given by any method reasonably calculated to provide actual notice. Any notice given by mail must be given by first-class or registered mail sent to the last address of the members shown on the corporation’s records.

(e) Any action challenging an expulsion, suspension, or termination of membership, including any claim alleging defective notice, must be commenced within one year after the date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination. In the event such an action is successful the court may order any relief, including reinstatement, it finds equitable under the circumstances, but no vote of the members or of the board may be set aside solely because a person was at the time of the vote wrongfully excluded by virtue of the challenged expulsion, suspension, or termination, unless the court finds further that the wrongful expulsion, suspension, or termination was in bad faith and for the purpose, and with the effect, of
 wrongfully excluding the member from the vote or from the meeting at which the vote took place, so as to affect the outcome of the vote.

(f) This section governs only the procedures for expulsion, suspension, or termination and not the substantive grounds therefor. An expulsion, suspension, or termination based upon substantive grounds which violate contractual or other rights of the member or are otherwise unlawful is not made valid by compliance with this section.

(g) A member who is expelled or suspended or whose membership is terminated shall be liable for any charges incurred, services or benefits actually rendered, dues, assessments, or fees incurred before expulsion, suspension, or termination or arising from contract or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 17.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Rights and Obligations of Members and Creditors [12440. - 12446.]

12440.

(a) A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

(b) No person is liable for any obligation arising from membership unless the person was admitted to membership upon the person’s application or with the person’s consent.

(c) The ownership of an interest in real property, when a condition of its ownership is membership in a corporation, shall be considered consent to such membership for the purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12441.

A corporation may levy dues, assessments, or fees upon its members pursuant to its articles or bylaws, but a member upon learning of them may avoid liability for them by promptly resigning from membership, except where the member is liable for them by contract, as a condition to ownership of an interest in real property, as an obligation arising out of the ownership of an interest in real property, or otherwise. Unless called to the attention of the member and agreed to in writing by the member, article or bylaw provisions authorizing such dues, assessments or fees do not, of themselves, create such liability. No action shall be brought by or on behalf of any creditor to levy or to require the levy of dues, assessments or fees upon the members of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12442.

A person holding a membership as pledgee or a membership as executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, receiver or in any representative or fiduciary capacity is not personally liable for any unpaid balance of the purchase price of the membership, or for any amount owing to the corporation by the member, because the membership is so held, but the estate and funds in the hands of such fiduciary or representative are liable and the membership subject to sale therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

12443.

(a) No action shall be brought by or on behalf of any creditor to reach and apply the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation to pay the amount due on such member’s membership or otherwise due to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceedings would be useless.

(b) All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any such creditor’s action to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation and any or all members who owe amounts to the corporation may be joined in such action. Several judgments may be rendered for and against the parties to the action or in favor of a receiver for the benefit of the respective parties thereto.

(c) All amounts paid by any member in any such action shall be credited on the unpaid balance due the corporation by such member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12444.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as in derogation of any rights or remedies which any creditor or member may have against any promoter, member, director, officer or the corporation because of participation in any fraud or illegality practiced upon such creditor or member by any such person or by the corporation or in derogation of any rights which the corporation may have by rescission, cancellation or otherwise because of any fraud or illegality practiced on it by any such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12445.

The articles or bylaws shall prescribe:

(a) The manner of determining each member’s share of the capital of the corporation contributed by the members and, if repayable, the time and manner for its repayment; and

(b) The manner of determining the value, if any, of the member’s interest in the corporation apart from contributed capital and the time and manner of the corporation’s purchase, if required, of such interest from a terminated member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12446.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall not apply to any proprietary interest in a consumer cooperative corporation. Any proprietary interest that would otherwise escheat to the state pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall instead become the property of the corporation.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no proprietary interest shall become the property of the corporation under this section unless the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The articles or bylaws shall specifically provide for the transfer of ownership of the otherwise escheated proprietary interests to the corporation.

(2) At least 60 days prior notice of the proposed transfer of the proprietary interest to the corporation is given to the affected member by first-class or second-class mail to the last address of the member shown on the corporation’s records, and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the corporation has its principal office. Notice given in the foregoing manner shall be deemed actual notice.

(3) No proprietary interest shall become the property of the
 corporation under this section if written notice objecting thereto is received by the corporation from the affected member prior to the date of the proposed transfer.

(c) For purposes of this section, a “proprietary interest” shall mean and include any membership, membership certificate, membership share, or share certificate of any class or series representing a proprietary interest in, and issued by, the corporation together with all accrued and unpaid dividends and patronage distributions relating thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 538, Sec. 8.   (AB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Distributions [12450. - 12455.]



  ARTICLE 1. Limitations [12450. - 12454.5.]

12450.

This chapter does not apply to any proceeding for winding up and dissolution of corporations under Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 12620), 16 (commencing with Section 12630), and 17 (commencing with Section 12650).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12451.

Distributions (Section 12235) in any fiscal year shall not exceed 15 percent, multiplied by contributions (whether by membership fees, capital credits, or otherwise) to capital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

12452.

A corporation may, subject to meeting the requirements of Section 12453 and any additional restrictions authorized by Section 12454, purchase or redeem memberships.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 378, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

12453.

Neither a corporation nor any of its subsidiaries shall purchase or redeem memberships, or make a patronage distribution to members out of earnings of the corporation on nonmember patronage, or make a distribution, if the corporation or the subsidiary purchasing or redeeming memberships or making the distribution is, or as a result thereof would be, likely to be unable to meet its liabilities (except those whose payment is otherwise adequately provided for) as they mature.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12454.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits additional restrictions upon the purchase or redemption of a membership, upon distributions, or upon patronage distributions, by provision in a corporation’s articles or bylaws or agreement entered into by the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12454.5.

(a) A worker cooperative may create an indivisible reserves account that shall not be distributed to members.

(b) Funds in the indivisible reserves account shall only derive from non-patronage-sourced income, in a manner provided in the articles or bylaws, or by the board, and shall be used as capital for the cooperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 18.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Liability of Members [12455. - 12455.]

12455.

(a) Any person who with knowledge of facts indicating the impropriety thereof receives any distribution, including a payment in redemption of a membership, prohibited by this chapter is liable to the corporation for the amount so received by the person with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments until paid.

(b) Any person who with knowledge of facts indicating the impropriety thereof receives any distribution, including a payment in redemption of a membership, prohibited by this chapter is liable to the corporation for the benefit of all of the creditors entitled to institute an action under subdivision (c) for the amount so received by the person with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments until paid, but not exceeding the liabilities of the corporation owed to nonconsenting creditors at the time of the violation.

(c) Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability to creditors arising under subdivision (b) for a violation of Section 12452 or 12453 against any or all persons liable by any one or more creditors of the corporation whose debts or claims arose prior to the time of the distribution and who have not consented thereto, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment.

(d) Any person sued under subdivision (b) may implead all other persons liable under subdivision (b) and may in the absence of fraud by the moving party compel contribution, either in that action or in an independent action against persons not joined in that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 812, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Meetings and Voting [12460. - 12477.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12460. - 12466.]

12460.

(a) Meetings of members may be held at a place within or without this state that is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no other place is so stated or fixed, meetings of members shall be held at the principal office of the corporation. Subject to any limitations in the articles or bylaws of the corporation, if authorized by the board of directors in its sole discretion, and subject to those guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, members not physically present in person at a meeting of members may, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, participate in a meeting of members, be deemed present in person, and vote at a meeting of members, subject to
 subdivision (f).

(b) Except as provided in Section 12460.5, a regular meeting of members shall be held annually. In any year in which directors are elected, the election shall be held at the regular meeting unless the directors are chosen in some other manner authorized by law. Any other proper business may be transacted at the meeting.

(c) If a corporation fails to hold the regular meeting for a period of 60 days after the date designated therefor or, if no date has been designated, for a period of 15 months after the formation of the corporation or after its last regular meeting, or if the corporation fails to hold a written ballot for a period of 60 days after the date designated therefor, then the superior court of the proper county may summarily order the meeting to be held or the ballot to be conducted upon the application of a member, after notice to the corporation giving
 it an opportunity to be heard.

(d) The votes represented at a meeting called or by written ballot ordered pursuant to subdivision (c) and entitled to be cast on the business to be transacted shall constitute a quorum, notwithstanding any provision of the articles or bylaws or provision in this part to the contrary. The court may issue such orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of the meeting, the record date for determination of members entitled to vote, and the form of notice of the meeting.

(e) Special meetings of members for any lawful purpose may be called by the board, the chairperson of the board, the president, or other persons, if any, as are specified in the bylaws. In addition, special meetings of members for any lawful purpose may be called by 5 percent or more of the members, however, in a worker cooperative
 with more than four worker-members, a special meeting may only be called by the greater of three worker-members or 5 percent of the worker-members. In a worker cooperative with fewer than four worker-members, special meetings may be called by one worker-member.

(f) A meeting of the members may be conducted, in whole or in part, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, by electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication if the corporation implements reasonable measures: (1) to provide members a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting concurrently with those proceedings, (2) if any member votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of electronic transmission to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or
 other means of remote communication, to maintain a record of that vote or action in its books and records, and (3) to verify that each person who has voted remotely is a member. A corporation shall not conduct a meeting of members solely by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication unless one or more of the following conditions apply: (A) all of the members consent; (B) the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (m) of Section 12320; or (C) notwithstanding the absence of consent from all members pursuant to (A) or subdivision (b) of Section 20, the meeting includes a live audiovisual feed for the duration of the meeting. A corporation holding a meeting pursuant to (C) may offer, in addition to remote audiovisual feed, an audio-only means by which a member may participate provided that the choice between participating via
 audiovisual or via audio-only means is made by the member and the corporation does not impose any barriers to either mode of participation. A de minimis disruption of an audio or audiovisual feed does not require a corporation to end a meeting under, or render the corporation out of compliance with, this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 41.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12460.5.

Notwithstanding Section 12460, a collective board worker cooperative shall not be required to hold an annual meeting of members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 20.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12461.

(a) Whenever members are required or permitted to take any action at a meeting, a written notice of the meeting shall be given not less than 10 nor more than 90 days before the date of the meeting to each member who, on the record date for notice of the meeting, is entitled to vote thereat; provided, however, that if notice is given by mail, and the notice is not mailed by first-class, registered, or certified mail, that notice shall be given not less than 20 days before the meeting. A worker cooperative shall provide notice of the meeting not less than 48 hours before the meeting if the meeting is a meeting of only worker-members, provided that the notice is delivered personally to every worker-member. Subject to subdivision (f), and
 subdivision (b) of Section 12462, that notice shall state the place, date, and time of the meeting, the means of electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, if any, by which members may participate in that meeting, and (1) in the case of a special meeting, the general nature of the business to be transacted, and no other business may be transacted, or (2) in the case of the regular meeting, those matters which the board, at the time the notice is given, intends to present for action by the members, but, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 12462, any proper matter may be presented at the meeting for such action. The notice of any meeting at which directors are to be elected shall include the names of all those who are nominees at the time the notice is given
 to members.
